Utah statutes.
16-6a-1103.   Articles of merger.
(1)  After a plan of merger is approved, pursuant to Section 16-6a-1102, the
surviving domestic nonprofit corporation shall deliver to the division for
filing articles of merger setting forth:
(a)  the plan of merger;
(b)  if shareholder or member approval was not required of any party to the
merger:
(i)  a statement to the effect that approval was not required; and
(ii)  a statement that the plan of merger was approved by a sufficient vote of
the board of directors of each party to the merger;
(c)  if approval of the shareholders or members of one or more domestic
corporation, foreign corporation, domestic nonprofit corporation, or foreign
nonprofit corporation party to the merger was required, a statement that the
number of votes cast for the plan by each voting group entitled to vote
separately on the merger was sufficient for approval by that voting group; and
(d)  if approval of the plan by some person or persons other than the
shareholders, members, or the board of directors is required pursuant to
Subsection 16-6a-1102(3), or other applicable law, a statement that the
approval was obtained.
(2)  A merger takes effect upon the effective date stated in the articles of
merger, which may not be prior to the date the articles of merger are filed.
(3)  Articles of merger shall be executed by each party to the merger.
